District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

34-1633

Consumer protections.

Repealed.

History

Oct. 3, 2001, D.C. Law 14-28, § 3604, 48 DCR 6981
Mar. 16, 2005, D.C. Law 15-227, § 18, 51 DCR 10549

Temporary Addition of Section

For temporary (225 day) addition, see § 4 of Prevention of Unauthorized Switching of Customer Natural Gas Accounts Temporary Act of 2001 (D.C. Law 14-13, July 10, 2001, law notification 48 DCR 6589).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 3304 of Fiscal Year 2002 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-124, August 3, 2001, 48 DCR 7861).
For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 4 of Prevention of Unauthorized Switching of Customer Natural Gas Accounts Emergency Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-31, April 2, 2001, 48 DCR 3338).